Hawaii statutes.
§386-85 Presumptions. In any
proceeding for the enforcement of a claim for compensation under this chapter
it shall be presumed, in the absence of substantial evidence to the contrary:

(1) That the claim is for a covered work injury;

(2) That sufficient notice of such injury has been
given;

(3) That the injury was not caused by the
intoxication of the injured employee; and

(4) That the injury was not caused by the wilful
intention of the injured employee to injure oneself or another. [L 1963, c 116,
pt of §1; Supp, §97-94; HRS §386-85; gen ch 1985]

Law Journals and Reviews

Japanese Corporate Warriors in Pursuit of a Legal Remedy:
The Story of Karoshi, or "Death from Overwork" in Japan. 21 UH L.
Rev. 169 (1999).

Case Notes

Scope and nature of presumption discussed. 51 H. 312, 459
P.2d 541 (1969); 51 H. 632, 466 P.2d 439 (1970).

Substantial evidence defined. 51 H. 312, 459 P.2d 541 (1969);
53 H. 406, 495 P.2d 1164 (1972).

Where death might have been caused by preexisting heart
condition or by occupational exertions or by both, presumption of paragraph (1)
was applicable. 51 H. 312, 459 P.2d 541 (1969).

Presumption places on employer the burden of going forward
with the evidence as well as that of persuasion. 53 H. 32, 487 P.2d 278 (1971);
53 H. 406, 495 P.2d 1164 (1972).

If employer fails to produce substantial evidence to
contrary, presumption dictates that claimant must win. 53 H. 161, 489 P.2d 419
(1971).

Evidence adduced by employer to show that death by heart
attack was not work-connected held not to amount to substantial evidence. 53
H. 406, 495 P.2d 1164 (1972).

Presumption may be rebutted only by substantial evidence to
the contrary. 53 H. 406, 495 P.2d 1164 (1972).

Presumption applies in §386-89(c) proceeding and places
burden on employer. 56 H. 552, 545 P.2d 692 (1976).

Employer has burden of going forward with evidence and burden
of ultimate persuasion, and all reasonable doubt should be resolved in favor of
claimant. 57 H. 296, 555 P.2d 855 (1976).

Proceeding for review brought by claimant under §386-89(c) is
a "proceeding for the enforcement of a claim for compensation under this
chapter". 57 H. 535, 560 P.2d 1292 (1977).

If employer fails to present substantial evidence to rebut
presumption, employee must prevail. 59 H. 551, 584 P.2d 119 (1978).

Paragraph (1) applies from outset. Preliminary showing that
injury occurred in course of employment not required. 63 H. 642, 636 P.2d 721
(1981).

Where labor and industrial relations appeals board failed
expressly to acknowledge statutory presumption of compensability in its
decision, issue deemed not to be whether board had explicitly referred to the
presumption, but whether the presumption had been rebutted by substantial
evidence; board’s conclusion that claimant was not engaged in
employment-related activity when claimant sustained injury was supported by
substantial evidence. 77 H. 100, 881 P.2d 1246 (1994).

Statutory presumption of paragraph (1) not triggered where
claimant conceded that accident was not work-related. 77 H. 152, 883 P.2d 73
(1994).

Employee's disability was compensable under this chapter
where labor appeals board failed to apply statutory presumption in favor of
compensability of employee's claim under this section, and employers failed to
demonstrate by substantial evidence that employee's disease (1) was not caused
by conditions that are characteristic of or peculiar to employee's employment
as a dental hygienist, (2) did not result from employee's actual exposure to
such conditions, and (3) was not due to causes in excess of the ordinary
hazards of employment in general. 94 H. 70, 9 P.3d 382 (2000).

In any proceeding on a claim for compensation due to an
alleged compensable consequence of a work-related injury, this section creates
a presumption in favor of the claimant that the subsequent injury is causally
related to the primary injury. 94 H. 297, 12 P.3d 1238 (2000).

Where the paragraph (1) presumption of work-connectedness was
neither applicable nor relevant to any issue on appeal, as a matter of law, the
appellate court erred in applying the presumption to the issue in the case. 97
H. 86, 34 P.3d 16 (2001).

Appellate court did not err in applying paragraph (1)
presumptions where whether the cause of claimant's permanent disability was
work-related or caused by prior injury and other personal and/or psychological
stresses was clearly at issue in the proceedings. 97 H. 402, 38 P.3d 570
(2001).

In order to overcome the paragraph (1) presumption of
work-relatedness, the employer must introduce substantial evidence to the
contrary; once the trier of fact determines that the employer has adduced
substantial evidence to overcome the presumption, it must weigh the evidence
elicited by the employer against the evidence elicited by the claimant. 97 H.
402, 38 P.3d 570 (2001).

Appeals board's decision denying employee's claim not clearly
erroneous where employer adduced substantial evidence rebutting the presumption
of compensability for employee's alleged stress-related workplace injury
through psychiatrist's report that employee suffered from preexisting paranoid
schizophrenia that was triggered by wage garnishment, which was not an incident
of employment. 98 H. 263, 47 P.3d 730 (2002).

Injury or death arises in course of employment when it takes place within the
period of employment, at place where the employee may reasonably be, and while
fulfilling duties or engaged in something incidental thereto. 1 H. App. 77,
613 P.2d 927 (1980).

Pursuant to requirements of §91-12, appeals board should
generally state whether or not it has applied presumption of paragraph (1).
But failure to do so in instant case did not prejudice appellant's substantial
rights. 1 H. App. 77, 613 P.2d 927 (1980).

Substantial evidence defined. 1 H. App. 77, 613 P.2d 927
(1980).

Scope and nature of presumption discussed. 3 H. App. 39, 640
P.2d 1175 (1982).

Board failed to correctly apply presumption of
compensability; decision that claimant's low back condition was not a
compensable consequence of a work injury was clearly erroneous in light of the
reliable, probative, and substantial evidence in the whole record. 94 H. 257
(App.), 12 P.3d 357 (2000).

In light of the strong presumption of work-relatedness under
Hawaii workers' compensation law, as well as the lack of any non-speculative
evidence to explain the cause of claimant's injuries from non-witnessed fall
while claimant was performing employment duties at claimant's place of
employment during working hours, employer failed to satisfy its heavy burden of
adducing a "high quantum" of "relevant and credible evidence of
a quality and quantity sufficient to justify a conclusion by a reasonable
person" that claimant's fall and consequent injuries were not
work-related. 101 H. 293 (App.), 67 P.3d 792 (2003).

Employer presented substantial evidence to rebut the
presumption that employee's injuries were work-related where the undisputed
evidence showed employee was injured while on unpaid leave, was injured while
bowling, an activity that was not part of employee's work duties, at an off
work site that was not operated or controlled by employer; employee's
attendance there was strictly voluntary; employer did not finance the
tournament; employer did not require employees to participate; and employer
derived no substantial direct benefit from the bowling tournament beyond the
intangible value of improvement in employee morale. 118 H. 239 (App.), 188
P.3d 753 (2008).

Mentioned: 52 H. 242, 473 P.2d 561 (1970); 4 H. App. 26, 659
P.2d 77 (1983).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next